es: Material del soporte para árboles: Hormigón; Metal; Plástico; Otros
hr-HR: Materijal stalka za stablo: Beton; Metal; Plastika; Ostalo
pt-PT: Material de suporte de árvore: Betão; Metal; Plástico; Outro
el: Υλικό βάσης δέντρου: Σκυρόδεμα; Μέταλλο; Πλαστικό; Άλλο
ru: Материал опоры под елку: Бетон; Металл; Пластик; Другой
zh-CN: 树架材质: 混凝土; 金属; 塑料; 其他
en: Tree stand material: Concrete; Metal; Plastic; Other
lt-LT: Bokštelio medžiaga: Betonas; Metalas; Plastikas; Kita
pt-BR: Material de plataforma em árvore: Concreto; Metal; Plástico; Outro
zh-TW: 爬樹架材質: 實心; 金屬; 塑膠; 其他
fi: Puun jalustan materiaali: Betoni; Metalli; Muovi; Muu
sv: Trädställning - material: Betong; Metall; Plast; Övrigt
fr: Matériau du poste de chasse: Béton; Métal; Plastique; Autre
ja: ツリースタンド材質: コンクリート; 金属; プラスチック; その他
ko: 나무 스탠드 소재: 콘크리트; 금속; 플라스틱; 기타
tr: Ağaç standı malzemesi: Beton; Metal; Plastik; Diğer
sl-SI: Material stojala za drevo: Beton; Kovina; Plastika; Drugo
ro-RO: Material suport pentru brad: Beton; Metal; Plastic; Altele
cs: Materiál posedu: Beton; Kov; Plast; Jiné
it: Materiale per il sostegno dell'albero: Calcestruzzo; Metallo; Plastica; Altro
pl: Materiał ambony: Beton; Metal; Tworzywo sztuczne; Inne
nl: Materiaal boomstandaard: Beton; Metaal; Plastic; Andere
de: Baumständermaterial: Beton; Metall; Kunststoff; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Materiál stojanu na stromček: Betón; Kov; Plast; Iné
bg-BG: Материал на стойка за дърво: Бетон; Метал; Пластмаса; Други
nb: Trestativmateriale: Betong; Metall; Plast; Annet
da: Jagttårnsmateriale: Beton; Metal; Plast; Andet
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำที่วางต้นไม้: คอนกรีต; โลหะ; พลาสติก; อื่นๆ
vi: Vật liệu giá đỡ cây: Bê tông; Kim loại; Nhựa; Khác
hu: Vadászles anyaga: Beton; Fém; Műanyag; Egyéb